Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.235

Development of model curriculum integrating vocational and academic education.

The superintendent of public instruction shall with the advice of the workforce training and education coordinating board develop model curriculum integrating vocational and academic education at the secondary level. The curriculum shall integrate vocational education for gainful employment with education in the academic subjects of English, math, science/technology, geography, and history, and with education in critical thinking. Upon completion, the model curriculum shall be provided for consideration and use by school districts.

[ 1991 c 238 s 141.]

NOTES: